New York, session 2025-2026, S9528.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1180-i to read as follows: 3 § 1180-i. Owner liability for failure of operator to comply with 4 certain posted maximum speed limits; city of Ithaca. (a) 1. Notwith- 5 standing any other provision of law, the city of Ithaca is hereby 6 authorized to establish a demonstration program imposing monetary 7 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 8 to comply with posted maximum speed limits in a school speed zone within 9 such city (i) when a school speed limit is in effect as provided in 10 paragraphs one and two of subdivision (c) of section eleven hundred 11 eighty of this article or (ii) when other speed limits are in effect as 12 provided in subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 13 eighty of this article during the following times: (A) on school days 14 during school hours and one hour before and one hour after the school 15 day, and (B) a period during student activities at the school and up to 16 thirty minutes immediately before and up to thirty minutes immediately 17 after such student activities. Such demonstration program shall empower 18 the city of Ithaca to install photo speed violation monitoring systems 19 within no more than twelve school speed zones within such city at any 20 one time and to operate such systems within such zones (iii) when a 21 school speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraphs one and two of 22 subdivision (c) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article or (iv) 23 when other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivision (b), 24 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article during EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14138-03-6 S. 9528--A 2 1 the following times: (A) on school days during school hours and one hour 2 before and one hour after the school day, and (B) a period during 3 student activities at the school and up to thirty minutes immediately 4 before and up to thirty minutes immediately after such student activ- 5 ities. In selecting a school speed zone in which to install and operate 6 a photo speed violation monitoring system, the city shall consider 7 criteria including, but not limited to, the speed data, crash history, 8 and the roadway geometry applicable to such school speed zone. 9 2. No photo speed violation monitoring system shall be used in a 10 school speed zone unless (i) on the day it is to be used it has success- 11 fully passed a self-test of its functions; and (ii) it has undergone an 12 annual calibration check performed pursuant to paragraph four of this 13 subdivision. The city shall install signs giving notice that a photo 14 speed violation monitoring system is in use to be mounted on advance 15 warning signs notifying motor vehicle operators of such upcoming school 16 speed zone and/or on speed limit signs applicable within such school 17 speed zone, in conformance with standards established in the MUTCD. 18 3. Operators of photo speed violation monitoring systems shall have 19 completed training in the procedures for setting up, testing, and oper- 20 ating such systems. Each such operator shall complete and sign a daily 21 set-up log for each such system that the operator operates that (i) 22 states the date and time when, and the location where, the system was 23 set up that day, and (ii) states that such operator successfully 24 performed, and the system passed, the self-tests of such system before 25 producing a recorded image that day. The city shall retain each such 26 daily log until the later of the date on which the photo speed violation 27 monitoring system to which it applies has been permanently removed from 28 use or the final resolution of all cases involving notices of liability 29 issued based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other 30 recorded images produced by such system. 31 4. Each photo speed violation monitoring system shall undergo an annu- 32 al calibration check performed by an independent calibration laboratory 33 which shall issue a signed certificate of calibration. The city shall 34 keep each such annual certificate of calibration on file until the final 35 resolution of all cases involving a notice of liability issued during 36 such year which were based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape 37 or other recorded images produced by such photo speed violation monitor- 38 ing system. 39 5. (i) Such demonstration program shall utilize necessary technologies 40 to ensure, to the extent practicable, that photographs, microphoto- 41 graphs, videotape or other recorded images produced by such photo speed 42 violation monitoring systems shall not include images that identify the 43 driver, the passengers, or the contents of the vehicle. Provided, 44 however, that no notice of liability issued pursuant to this section 45 shall be dismissed solely because such a photograph, microphotograph, 46 videotape or other recorded image allows for the identification of the 47 driver, the passengers, or the contents of vehicles where the city shows 48 that it made reasonable efforts to comply with the provisions of this 49 paragraph in such case. 50 (ii) Photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other recorded 51 image from a photo speed violation monitoring system shall be for the 52 exclusive use of the city for the purpose of the adjudication of liabil- 53 ity imposed pursuant to this section and of the owner receiving a notice 54 of liability pursuant to this section, and shall be destroyed by the 55 city upon the final resolution of the notice of liability to which such 56 photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images S. 9528--A 3 1 relate, or one year following the date of issuance of such notice of 2 liability, whichever is later. Notwithstanding the provisions of any 3 other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, photographs, microphoto- 4 graphs, videotape or any other recorded image from a photo speed 5 violation monitoring system shall not be open to the public, nor subject 6 to civil or criminal process or discovery, nor used by any court or 7 administrative or adjudicatory body in any action or proceeding therein 8 except that which is necessary for the adjudication of a notice of 9 liability issued pursuant to this section, and no public entity or 10 employee, officer or agent thereof shall disclose such information, 11 except that such photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other 12 recorded images from such systems: 13 (A) shall be available for inspection and copying and use by the motor 14 vehicle owner and operator for so long as such photographs, microphoto- 15 graphs, videotape or other recorded images are required to be maintained 16 or are maintained by such public entity, employee, officer or agent; and 17 (B) (1) shall be furnished when described in a search warrant issued 18 by a court authorized to issue such a search warrant pursuant to article 19 six hundred ninety of the criminal procedure law or a federal court 20 authorized to issue such a search warrant under federal law, where such 21 search warrant states that there is reasonable cause to believe such 22 information constitutes evidence of, or tends to demonstrate that, a 23 misdemeanor or felony offense was committed in this state or another 24 state, or that a particular person participated in the commission of a 25 misdemeanor or felony offense in this state or another state, provided, 26 however, that if such offense was against the laws of another state, the 27 court shall only issue a warrant if the conduct comprising such offense 28 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony 29 against the laws of this state; and 30 (2) shall be furnished in response to a subpoena duces tecum signed by 31 a judge of competent jurisdiction and issued pursuant to article six 32 hundred ten of the criminal procedure law or a judge or magistrate of a 33 federal court authorized to issue such a subpoena duces tecum under 34 federal law, where the judge finds and the subpoena states that there is 35 reasonable cause to believe such information is relevant and material to 36 the prosecution, or the defense, or the investigation by an authorized 37 law enforcement official, of the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or 38 felony in this state or another state, provided, however, that if such 39 offense was against the laws of another state, such judge or magistrate 40 shall only issue such subpoena if the conduct comprising such offense 41 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony in 42 this state; and 43 (3) may, if lawfully obtained pursuant to this clause and clause (A) 44 of this subparagraph and otherwise admissible, be used in such criminal 45 action or proceeding. 46 (b) If the city of Ithaca establishes a demonstration program pursuant 47 to subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a vehicle shall be 48 liable for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section if such vehicle 49 was used or operated with the permission of the owner, express or 50 implied, within a school speed zone in violation of subdivision (c) or 51 during the times authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section 52 in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven 53 hundred eighty of this article, such vehicle was traveling at a speed of 54 more than ten miles per hour above the posted speed limit in effect 55 within such school speed zone, and such violation is evidenced by infor- 56 mation obtained from a photo speed violation monitoring system; provided S. 9528--A 4 1 however that no owner of a vehicle shall be liable for a penalty imposed 2 pursuant to this section where the operator of such vehicle has been 3 convicted of the underlying violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 4 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 5 (c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 6 following meanings: 7 1. "manual on uniform traffic control devices" or "MUTCD" shall mean 8 the manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic control 9 devices maintained by the commissioner of transportation pursuant to 10 section sixteen hundred eighty of this chapter; 11 2. "owner" shall have the meaning provided in article two-B of this 12 chapter; 13 3. "photo speed violation monitoring system" shall mean a vehicle 14 sensor installed to work in conjunction with a speed measuring device 15 which automatically produces two or more photographs, two or more micro- 16 photographs, a videotape or other recorded images of each vehicle at the 17 time it is used or operated in a school speed zone in violation of 18 subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty 19 of this article in accordance with the provisions of this section; and 20 4. "school speed zone" shall mean a distance not to exceed one thou- 21 sand three hundred twenty feet on a highway passing a school building, 22 entrance or exit of a school abutting on the highway. 23 (d) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by 24 the city of Ithaca, or a facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of 25 photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images 26 produced by a photo speed violation monitoring system, shall be prima 27 facie evidence of the facts contained therein. Any photographs, micro- 28 photographs, videotape or other recorded images evidencing such a 29 violation shall include at least two date and time stamped images of the 30 rear of the motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near 31 the motor vehicle and shall be available for inspection reasonably in 32 advance of and at any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for such 33 violation pursuant to this section. 34 (e) An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 35 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to a 36 demonstration program established pursuant to this section shall be 37 liable for monetary penalties in accordance with a schedule of fines and 38 penalties to be promulgated by the parking violations bureau of the city 39 of Ithaca. The liability of the owner pursuant to this section shall 40 not exceed fifty dollars for each violation; provided, however, that 41 such parking violations bureau may provide for an additional penalty not 42 in excess of twenty-five dollars for each violation for the failure to 43 respond to a notice of liability within the prescribed time period. 44 (f) An imposition of liability under the demonstration program estab- 45 lished pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a conviction as an 46 operator and shall not be made part of the operating record of the 47 person upon whom such liability is imposed nor shall it be used for 48 insurance purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage. 49 (g) 1. A notice of liability shall be sent by first class mail to each 50 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 51 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this arti- 52 cle pursuant to this section, within fourteen business days if such 53 owner is a resident of this state and within forty-five business days if 54 such owner is a non-resident. Personal delivery on the owner shall not 55 be required. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the S. 9528--A 5 1 ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts 2 contained therein. 3 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 4 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 5 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this arti- 6 cle pursuant to this section, the registration number of the vehicle 7 involved in such violation, the location where such violation took 8 place, the date and time of such violation, the identification number of 9 the camera which recorded the violation or other document locator 10 number, at least two date and time stamped images of the rear of the 11 motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near the motor 12 vehicle, and the certificate charging the liability. 13 3. The notice of liability shall contain information advising the 14 person charged of the manner and the time in which the person may 15 contest the liability alleged in the notice. Such notice of liability 16 shall also contain a prominent warning to advise the person charged that 17 failure to contest in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an 18 admission of liability and that a default judgment may be entered there- 19 on. 20 4. The notice of liability shall be prepared and mailed by the city of 21 Ithaca parking violations bureau, or by any other entity authorized by 22 the city to prepare and mail such notice of liability. 23 (h) Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners of this section 24 shall be by the city of Ithaca parking violations bureau. 25 (i) If an owner receives a notice of liability pursuant to this 26 section for any time period during which the vehicle or the number plate 27 or plates of such vehicle was reported to the police department as 28 having been stolen, it shall be a valid defense to an allegation of 29 liability for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 30 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section 31 that the vehicle or the number plate or plates of such vehicle had been 32 reported to the police as stolen prior to the time the violation 33 occurred and had not been recovered by such time. For purposes of 34 asserting the defense provided by this subdivision, it shall be suffi- 35 cient that a certified copy of the police report on the stolen vehicle 36 or number plate or plates of such vehicle be sent by first class mail to 37 the city of Ithaca parking violations bureau or by any other entity 38 authorized by the city to prepare and mail such notice of liability. 39 (j) 1. An owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of 40 liability was issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section shall 41 not be liable for the violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) 42 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this 43 section, provided that: 44 (i) prior to the violation, the lessor has filed with such parking 45 violations bureau in accordance with the provisions of section two 46 hundred thirty-nine of this chapter; and 47 (ii) within thirty-seven days after receiving notice from such bureau 48 of the date and time of a liability, together with the other information 49 contained in the original notice of liability, the lessor submits to 50 such bureau the correct name and address of the lessee of the vehicle 51 identified in the notice of liability at the time of such violation, 52 together with such other additional information contained in the rental, 53 lease or other contract document, as may be reasonably required by such 54 bureau pursuant to regulations that may be promulgated for such purpose. S. 9528--A 6 1 2. Failure to comply with subparagraph (ii) of paragraph one of this 2 subdivision shall render the owner liable for the penalty prescribed in 3 this section. 4 3. Where the lessor complies with the provisions of paragraph one of 5 this subdivision, the lessee of such vehicle on the date of such 6 violation shall be deemed to be the owner of such vehicle for purposes 7 of this section, shall be subject to liability for such violation pursu- 8 ant to this section and shall be sent a notice of liability pursuant to 9 subdivision (g) of this section. 10 (k) 1. If the owner liable for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 11 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this 12 section was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the 13 violation, the owner may maintain an action for indemnification against 14 the operator. 15 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no owner of a 16 vehicle shall be subject to a monetary fine imposed pursuant to this 17 section if the operator of such vehicle was operating such vehicle with- 18 out the consent of the owner at the time such operator operated such 19 vehicle in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section 20 eleven hundred eighty of this article. For purposes of this subdivision 21 there shall be a presumption that the operator of such vehicle was oper- 22 ating such vehicle with the consent of the owner at the time such opera- 23 tor operated such vehicle in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 24 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 25 (l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability 26 of an operator of a vehicle for any violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 27 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 28 (m) If the city adopts a demonstration program pursuant to subdivision 29 (a) of this section it shall conduct a study and submit an annual report 30 on the results of the use of photo devices to the governor, the tempo- 31 rary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly on or 32 before the first day of June next succeeding the effective date of this 33 section and on the same date in each succeeding year in which the demon- 34 stration program is operable. Such report shall include: 35 1. the locations where and dates when photo speed violation monitoring 36 systems were used; 37 2. the aggregate number, type and severity of crashes, fatalities, 38 injuries and property damage reported within all school speed zones 39 within the city, to the extent the information is maintained by the 40 department of motor vehicles of this state; 41 3. the aggregate number, type and severity of crashes, fatalities, 42 injuries and property damage reported within school speed zones where 43 photo speed violation monitoring systems were used, to the extent the 44 information is maintained by the department of motor vehicles of this 45 state; 46 4. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 47 within the city, in the aggregate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 48 5. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 49 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used, in the aggre- 50 gate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 51 6. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 52 within the city that were: 53 (i) more than ten but not more than twenty miles per hour over the 54 posted speed limit; 55 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 56 posted speed limit; S. 9528--A 7 1 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 2 posted speed limit; and 3 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 4 7. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 5 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used that were: 6 (i) more than ten but not more than twenty miles per hour over the 7 posted speed limit; 8 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 9 posted speed limit; 10 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 11 posted speed limit; and 12 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 13 8. the total number of notices of liability issued for violations 14 recorded by such systems; 15 9. the number of fines and total amount of fines paid after the first 16 notice of liability issued for violations recorded by such systems; 17 10. the number of violations adjudicated and the results of such adju- 18 dications including breakdowns of dispositions made for violations 19 recorded by such systems; 20 11. the total amount of revenue realized by the city in connection 21 with the program; 22 12. the expenses incurred by the city in connection with the program; 23 and 24 13. the quality of the adjudication process and its results. 25 (n) It shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of subdi- 26 vision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of 27 this article pursuant to this section that such photo speed violation 28 monitoring system was malfunctioning at the time of the alleged 29 violation. 30 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public officers law is amended 31 by adding a new paragraph (x) to read as follows: 32 (x) are photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 33 images prepared under the authority of section eleven hundred eighty-i 34 of the vehicle and traffic law. 35 § 3. The purchase or lease of equipment for a demonstration program 36 established pursuant to section 1180-i of the vehicle and traffic law, 37 as added by section one of this act, shall be subject to the provisions 38 of section 103 of the general municipal law. 39 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 40 have become a law and shall expire December 31, 2031, when upon such 41 date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. Effective 42 immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regu- 43 lation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective 44 date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective 45 date.